Hawaii statutes.
§431:10B-113 Enforcement. (a) The
commissioner may, after notice and hearing as provided in chapter 91, issue
such rules and regulations as the commissioner deems appropriate for the
supervision of this article.

(b) Whenever the commissioner finds that there
has been a violation of this article or of any rules or regulations issued
pursuant thereto, and after written notice thereof and hearing given to the
insurer or other person authorized or licensed by the commissioner, the
commissioner shall set forth the details of the commissioner's findings
together with an order for compliance by a specified date. The order shall be
binding on the insurer and any other person authorized or licensed by the
commissioner on the date specified, unless sooner withdrawn by the commissioner
or a stay of the order has been ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(c) In all proceedings before the
commissioner, the commissioner shall have the same powers with respect to
administering oaths, compelling the attendance of witnesses and the production
of documentary evidence, and examining witnesses as are granted the
commissioner in section 431:2-204.

(d) In cases of disobedience by any person of
any order or subpoena issued by the commissioner, or the refusal of any witness
to testify to any matter regarding which the witness may be questioned
lawfully, the commissioner may apply to any court for an order to compel
testimony or production of documents. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next